Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2117
Cease and desist order; fine; injunction; procedures; appeal.

(1) The Director of Banking and Finance may summarily order a lessor to cease and desist from the use of certain forms or practices relating to consumer rental purchase agreements if he or she finds that (a) there has been a substantial failure to comply with any of the provisions of the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act or (b) the continued use of certain forms or practices relating to consumer rental purchase agreements would constitute misrepresentation to or deceit or fraud on the consumer.

(2) If the director believes, whether or not based upon an investigation conducted under section 69-2116, that any person or lessor has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act or any rule, regulation, or order under the act, the director may:

(a) Issue a cease and desist order;

(b) Impose a fine of not to exceed one thousand dollars per violation, in addition to costs of the investigation; or

(c) Initiate an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin such acts or practices and to enforce compliance with the act or any order under the act.

(3) Upon a proper showing a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus shall be granted. The director shall not be required to post a bond.

(4) The fines and costs imposed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to all other penalties imposed by the laws of this state. The director shall collect the fines and costs and remit them to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit the costs to the Securities Act Cash Fund and distribute the fines in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska. If a person fails to pay the fine or costs of the investigation referred to in this subsection, a lien in the amount of the fine and costs shall be imposed upon all of the assets and property of such person in this state and may be recovered by suit by the director. Failure of the person to pay a fine and costs shall constitute a separate violation of the act.

(5) Upon entry of an order pursuant to this section, the director shall promptly notify all persons to whom such order is directed that it has been entered and of the reasons for such order and that any person to whom the order is directed may request a hearing in writing within fifteen business days of the issuance of the order. Upon a receipt of a written request, the matter shall be set down for hearing to commence within thirty business days after the receipt unless the parties consent to a later date or the hearing officer sets a later date for good cause. If a hearing is not requested within fifteen business days and none is ordered by the director, the order shall automatically become final and shall remain in effect until it is modified or vacated by the director. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the director after notice and hearing shall enter his or her written findings of fact and conclusions of law and may affirm, modify, or vacate the order.

(6) The director may vacate or modify a cease and desist order if he or she finds that the conditions which caused its entry have changed or that it is otherwise in the public interest to do so.

(7) Any person aggrieved by a final order of the director may appeal the order. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1993, LB 111, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 53, § 111;

Laws 2019, LB259, § 12.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.